Utah statutes.
20A-11-513.   Termination of duty to report.

(1)  A registered political party or county political party is subject to year-end summary reporting requirements until the registered political party or county political party has filed a statement of dissolution with the lieutenant governor stating that:

(a)  the political party is no longer receiving contributions and is no longer making expenditures;

(b)  the ending balance on the last summary report filed is zero; and

(c)  a final summary report in the form required by this part showing a zero balance is filed with the statement of dissolution.

(2)  A statement of dissolution and a final summary report may be filed at any time.

(3)  A registered political party or county political party shall continue to file the year-end summary report required by this part until the statement of dissolution and final summary report required by this section are filed with the lieutenant governor.

